fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON -âpam
-âpam/:âpam/ -am1 "weight: 24.247022" ; ! n=1/113 [0/145429]
-âpam/:âpam/ -ikowisi "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=2/113 [4/145429]
-âpam/:âpam/ -ikw- "weight: 24.247022" ; ! n=1/113 [0/145429]
-âpam/:âpam/ -iso "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=2/113 [6/145429]
-âpam/:âpam/ -iwê "weight: 21.849127" ; ! n=11/113 [0/145429]
-âpam/:âpam/ -kan2 "weight: 22.637584" ; ! n=5/113 [0/145429]
-âpam/:âpam/ -kê "weight: 15.459224" ; ! n=22/113 [33/145429]
-âpam/:âpam/ -nâkosi "weight: 23.553875" ; ! n=2/113 [0/145429]
-âpam/:âpam/ -nâkwan "weight: 23.553875" ; ! n=2/113 [0/145429]
-âpam/:âpam/ -o "weight: 18.309104" ; ! n=7/113 [6/145429]
-âpam/:âpam/ -to "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/113 [1/145429]
-âpam+Der/N:âpam NI "weight: 24.247022" ; ! n=1/113 (NI-1) [0/145429]
@R.class.TA@-âpam+Der/V:@R.class.TA@âpam VTA "weight: 12.001006" ; ! n=54/113 (VTA-1) [427/145429]

LEXICON -âpan
@R.class.II@-âpan+Der/V:@R.class.II@âpan3 VII-n "weight: 28.335097" ; ! n=1/3 (VII-2n) [0/145429]
@R.class.II@-âpan+Der/V:@R.class.II@âpan3 VII-n-SG "weight: 19.274185" ; ! n=2/3 (VII-1n) [8/145429]

LEXICON -âpas
-âpas/:âpas/ -ikê1 "weight: 26.137872" ; ! n=8/11 [0/145429]
@R.class.TI@-âpas+Der/V:@R.class.TI@âpas VTI-m "weight: 18.750937" ; ! n=3/11 (VTI-1) [9/145429]

LEXICON -âpaso1
-âpaso1/:âpaso/ -win "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/8 [0/145429]
@R.class.AI@-âpaso1+Der/V:@R.class.AI@âpaso VAI-io "weight: 19.407717" ; ! n=7/8 (VAI-1) [2/145429]

LEXICON -âpaso2
@R.class.AI@-âpaso2+Der/V:@R.class.AI@âpaso VAI-io "weight: 19.744189" ; ! n=5/5 (VAI-1) [2/145429]

LEXICON -âpasw
-âpasw/:âpasw/ -iwê "weight: 28.217314" ; ! n=1/13 [0/145429]
-âpasw/:âpasw/ -o "weight: 19.274185" ; ! n=8/13 [2/145429]
@R.class.TA@-âpasw+Der/V:@R.class.TA@âpasw VTA "weight: 18.714569" ; ! n=4/13 (VTA-3) [7/145429]

LEXICON -âpi
-âpi/:âpi/ -cin "weight: 24.881149" ; ! n=1/70 [0/145429]
-âpi/:âpi/ -h "weight: 24.188002" ; ! n=2/70 [0/145429]
-âpi/:âpi/ -makan "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/70 [1/145429]
-âpi/:âpi/ -n1 "weight: 24.881149" ; ! n=1/70 [0/145429]
-âpi/:âpi/ -n3 "weight: 24.881149" ; ! n=1/70 [0/145429]
-âpi/:âpi/ -paýiho "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=4/70 [1/145429]
-âpi/:âpi/ -si "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/70 [2/145429]
-âpi/:âpi/ -staw "weight: 24.881149" ; ! n=1/70 [0/145429]
-âpi/:âpi/ -w2 "weight: 24.881149" ; ! n=1/70 [0/145429]
-âpi/:âpi/ -win "weight: 18.491426" ; ! n=7/70 [5/145429]
-âpi+Der/N:âpi NA "weight: 24.881149" ; ! n=1/70 (NA-1) [0/145429]
@R.class.AI@-âpi+Der/V:@R.class.AI@âpi VAI-io "weight: 12.686635" ; ! n=48/70 (VAI-1) [242/145429]
-âpi/:âpi/ wi "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/70 [2/145429]

LEXICON -âpihk-
-âpihk-/:âpihk/ -ah1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
-âpihk-/:âpihk/ -ahw1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
-âpihk-/:âpihk/ -an1 "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]
-âpihk-/:âpihk/ -âT "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
-âpihk-/:âpihk/ -ât "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]
-âpihk-/:âpihk/ -ê1 "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]
-âpihk-/:âpihk/ -ê2 "weight: 28.399636" ; ! n=15/24 [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpikwaniy
-âpikwaniy/:âpikwaniy/ -is "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/3 [0/145429]
-âpikwaniy/:âpikwaniy/ -iwan "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/3 [0/145429]
-âpikwaniy+Der/N:âpikwaniy NI "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/3 (NI-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpisin
@R.class.AI@-âpisin+Der/V:@R.class.AI@âpisin3 VAI-n "weight: 16.768659" ; ! n=14/16 (VAI-2) [14/145429]
-âpisin/:âpisin/ i "weight: 18.645576" ; ! n=2/16 [15/145429]

LEXICON -âpisk-
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -S2 "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=3/175 [2/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -ah1 "weight: 15.978348" ; ! n=27/175 [16/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -ahw1 "weight: 25.043901" ; ! n=5/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -an1 "weight: 26.653338" ; ! n=1/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -atah "weight: 25.267044" ; ! n=4/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -atahw "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/175 [1/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -htin1 "weight: 25.554726" ; ! n=3/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -i "weight: 26.653338" ; ! n=1/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -ihkomân "weight: 26.653338" ; ! n=1/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -is "weight: 26.653338" ; ! n=1/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -isi "weight: 18.645576" ; ! n=30/175 [1/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -it "weight: 26.653338" ; ! n=1/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -n1 "weight: 17.729286" ; ! n=15/175 [5/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -paýi "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/175 [1/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -pit "weight: 26.653338" ; ! n=1/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -s2 "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=12/175 [1/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -sin "weight: 26.653338" ; ! n=1/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -sin1 "weight: 26.653338" ; ! n=1/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -so "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/175 [1/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -sw "weight: 26.653338" ; ! n=1/175 [0/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -sw2 "weight: 17.903639" ; ! n=9/175 [7/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -tê1 "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=3/175 [2/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -â1 "weight: 16.363194" ; ! n=49/175 [6/145429]
-âpisk-/:âpisk/ -ât "weight: 26.653338" ; ! n=1/175 [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpiskan-
-âpiskan-/:âpiskan/ -ê2 "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/3 [1/145429]

LEXICON -âpiskw
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -i "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=9/91 [1/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -im1 "weight: 25.547004" ; ! n=1/91 [0/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -is "weight: 16.411984" ; ! n=14/91 [20/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -iwan "weight: 25.547004" ; ! n=1/91 [0/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -iwi "weight: 25.547004" ; ! n=1/91 [0/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -iwi2 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/91 [1/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -min "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=1/91 [4/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -tâp- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/91 [2/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -tâpân "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/91 [2/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -â1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/91 [1/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ -êyâpiy "weight: 19.338724" ; ! n=1/91 [15/145429]
-âpiskw+Der/N:âpiskw NA "weight: 15.924281" ; ! n=12/91 (NA-3) [38/145429]
-âpiskw+Der/N:âpiskw NI "weight: 14.707236" ; ! n=35/91 (NI-3) [44/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ apoy- "weight: 25.547004" ; ! n=1/91 [0/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ askihkw- "weight: 25.547004" ; ! n=1/91 [0/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ astotin- "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=3/91 [2/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ awâsis- "weight: 25.547004" ; ! n=1/91 [0/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ oý- "weight: 25.547004" ; ! n=1/91 [0/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ oýâkan- "weight: 24.448392" ; ! n=3/91 [0/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ âhcan- "weight: 25.547004" ; ! n=1/91 [0/145429]
-âpiskw/:âpiskw/ êmihkwân- "weight: 25.547004" ; ! n=1/91 [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpiskw-
-âpiskw-/:âpiskw/ -ê2 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpit-
-âpit-/:âpit/ -ak1- "weight: 27.929632" ; ! n=1/46 [0/145429]
-âpit-/:âpit/ -kan- "weight: 27.929632" ; ! n=1/46 [0/145429]
-âpit-/:âpit/ -kanân "weight: 27.929632" ; ! n=1/46 [0/145429]
-âpit-/:âpit/ -ê1 "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/46 [1/145429]
-âpit-/:âpit/ -ê2 "weight: 15.959999" ; ! n=40/46 [11/145429]
-âpit-+Der/N:âpit NI "weight: 27.929632" ; ! n=1/46 (NI-1) [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpit-ak-
-âpit-ak-/:âpit-ak/ -â1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpiwin-
-âpiwin-/:âpiwin/ -ê2 "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/2 [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpiwinân
-âpiwinân/:âpiwinân/ -is "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/5 [0/145429]
-âpiwinân+Der/N:âpiwinân NI "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/5 (NI-1) [0/145429]
@R.noun.DepNonKin@-âpiwinân+Der/N:@R.noun.DepNonKin@âpiwinân NID "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 (NDI-1) [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpiy
-âpiy+Der/N:âpiy NI "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 (NI-2) [0/145429]
@R.noun.DepNonKin@-âpiy+Der/N:@R.noun.DepNonKin@âpiy NID "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 (NDI-2) [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpoh
-âpoh/:âpoh/ -iwê "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/4 [0/145429]
@R.class.TA@-âpoh+Der/V:@R.class.TA@âpoh VTA "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/4 (VTA-1) [0/145429]

LEXICON -âpoko
@R.class.AI@-âpoko+Der/V:@R.class.AI@âpoko VAI-io "weight: 29.315926" ; ! n=6/6 (VAI-1) [0/145429]

LEXICON iT-
iT-/:iT/ -âpam "weight: 18.631830" ; ! n=8/762 [0/145429]
iT-/:iT/ -âpi "weight: 16.065360" ; ! n=4/762 [99/145429]
iT-/:iT/ -âpihk- "weight: 20.711272" ; ! n=1/762 [0/145429]
iT-/:iT/ -âpisin "weight: 18.057790" ; ! n=3/762 [18/145429]
LEXICON kwêsk-
kwêsk-/:kwêsk/ -âpihk- "weight: 24.278974" ; ! n=3/104 [0/145429]
kwêsk-/:kwêsk/ -âpisk- "weight: 24.684439" ; ! n=2/104 [0/145429]
LEXICON kîs1-
kîs1-/:kîs/ -âpisk- "weight: 23.877847" ; ! n=1/141 [0/145429]
LEXICON kîsk-
kîsk-/:kîsk/ -âpisk- "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/186 [3/145429]
LEXICON mahk-
mahk-/:mahk/ -âpisk- "weight: 27.013341" ; ! n=1/89 [0/145429]
mahk-/:mahk/ -âpit- "weight: 25.914729" ; ! n=3/89 [0/145429]
LEXICON mihkw-
mihkw-/:mihkw/ -âpisk- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/127 [1/145429]
LEXICON miýw-
miýw-/:miýw/ -âpam "weight: 21.028566" ; ! n=4/374 [0/145429]
miýw-/:miýw/ -âpaso2 "weight: 22.414860" ; ! n=1/374 [0/145429]
miýw-/:miýw/ -âpi "weight: 22.414860" ; ! n=1/374 [0/145429]
miýw-/:miýw/ -âpisin "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/374 [1/145429]
miýw-/:miýw/ -âpisk- "weight: 21.316248" ; ! n=3/374 [0/145429]
LEXICON mâý-
mâý-/:mâý/ -âpaso2 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/198 [1/145429]
mâý-/:mâý/ -âpisk- "weight: 22.785049" ; ! n=3/198 [0/145429]
mâý-/:mâý/ -âpit- "weight: 23.190514" ; ! n=2/198 [0/145429]
LEXICON mêst-
mêst-/:mêst/ -âpit- "weight: 24.270353" ; ! n=2/142 [0/145429]
LEXICON nîsw-
nîsw-/:nîsw/ -âpisk- "weight: 25.039260" ; ! n=1/90 [0/145429]
LEXICON papâm-
papâm-/:papâm/ -âpoko "weight: 24.769092" ; ! n=1/116 [0/145429]
LEXICON pim-
pim-/:pim/ -âpam "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/326 [1/145429]
pim-/:pim/ -âpoh "weight: 21.340705" ; ! n=2/326 [0/145429]
pim-/:pim/ -âpoko "weight: 22.033853" ; ! n=1/326 [0/145429]
LEXICON pêt-
pêt-/:pêt/ -âpam "weight: 24.720806" ; ! n=1/145 [0/145429]
pêt-/:pêt/ -âpan "weight: 19.967332" ; ! n=1/145 [8/145429]
pêt-/:pêt/ -âpi "weight: 24.720806" ; ! n=1/145 [0/145429]
LEXICON sâpw-
sâpw-/:sâpw/ -âpam "weight: 24.677966" ; ! n=2/157 [0/145429]
LEXICON sôhk-
sôhk-/:sôhk/ -âpisk- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/151 [1/145429]
sôhk-/:sôhk/ -âpiskw "weight: 24.353082" ; ! n=1/151 [0/145429]
LEXICON takahk-
takahk-/:takahk/ -âpam "weight: 25.172792" ; ! n=1/112 [0/145429]
LEXICON têp-
têp-/:têp/ -âpam "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/188 [1/145429]
têp-/:têp/ -âpi "weight: 23.931431" ; ! n=1/188 [0/145429]
LEXICON w
w/:w/ -âpiskw "weight: 22.267540" ; ! n=3/598 [0/145429]
LEXICON wan-
wan-/:wan/ -âpam "weight: 23.294903" ; ! n=3/154 [0/145429]
LEXICON wâp-
wâp-/:wâp/ -âpisk- "weight: 21.821496" ; ! n=2/161 [0/145429]
LEXICON wîsak-
wîsak-/:wîsak/ -âpaso1 "weight: 25.302551" ; ! n=1/96 [0/145429]
wîsak-/:wîsak/ -âpasw "weight: 25.302551" ; ! n=1/96 [0/145429]
wîsak-/:wîsak/ -âpi "weight: 25.302551" ; ! n=1/96 [0/145429]
LEXICON y
y/:y/ -âpam "weight: 18.827898" ; ! n=5/426 [5/145429]
y/:y/ -âpan "weight: 23.450403" ; ! n=2/426 [0/145429]
y/:y/ -âpaso1 "weight: 23.450403" ; ! n=2/426 [0/145429]
y/:y/ -âpaso2 "weight: 24.143550" ; ! n=1/426 [0/145429]
y/:y/ -âpasw "weight: 23.450403" ; ! n=2/426 [0/145429]
y/:y/ -âpi "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=4/426 [1/145429]
y/:y/ -âpihk- "weight: 23.044938" ; ! n=3/426 [0/145429]
y/:y/ -âpisk- "weight: 17.952429" ; ! n=20/426 [3/145429]
y/:y/ -âpiskw "weight: 17.364643" ; ! n=6/426 [18/145429]
